Alaska, session 34, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 18.80.220(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) Except as provided in (c) of this section, it is unlawful for 07 (1) an employer to refuse employment to a person, or to bar a person 08 from employment, or to discriminate against a person in compensation or in a term, 09 condition, or privilege of employment because of the person's race, religion, color, or 10 national origin, because of the person's medical debt, or because of the person's age, 11 physical or mental disability, sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, 12 or parenthood when the reasonable demands of the position do not require distinction 13 on the basis of age, physical or mental disability, sex, marital status, changes in 14 marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood; 01 (2) a labor organization, because of a person's sex, marital status, 02 changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, race, religion, physical or 03 mental disability, color, [OR] national origin, or medical debt, to exclude or to expel 04 a person from its membership, or to discriminate in any way against one of its 05 members or an employer or an employee; 06 (3) an employer or employment agency to print or circulate or cause to 07 be printed or circulated a statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use a form of 08 application for employment or to make an inquiry in connection with prospective 09 employment, that expresses, directly or indirectly, a limitation, specification, or 10 discrimination as to sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in 11 marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, race, creed, color, [OR] national origin, or 12 medical debt, or an intent to make the limitation, unless based on [UPON] a bona fide 13 occupational qualification; 14 (4) an employer, labor organization, or employment agency to 15 discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against a person because the person has 16 opposed any practices forbidden under AS 18.80.200 - 18.80.280 or because the 17 person has filed a complaint, testified, or assisted in a proceeding under this chapter; 18 (5) an employer to discriminate in the payment of wages as between 19 the sexes, or to employ a female in an occupation in this state at a salary or wage rate 20 less than that paid to a male employee for work of comparable character or work in the 21 same operation, business, or type of work in the same locality; or 22 (6) a person to print, publish, broadcast, or otherwise circulate a 23 statement, inquiry, or advertisement in connection with prospective employment that 24 expresses directly a limitation, specification, or discrimination as to sex, physical or 25 mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, 26 race, religion, color, [OR] national origin, or medical debt, unless based on [UPON] 27 a bona fide occupational qualification. 28 * Sec. 2. AS 18.80.240 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 29 (b) It is unlawful for the owner, lessee, manager, or other person having the 30 right to lease or rent residential real property 31 (1) to refuse to lease or rent the real property to a person because of the 01 person's medical debt; 02 (2) to discriminate against a person in a term, condition, or privilege 03 relating to the use, lease, or rental of the real property because of the person's medical 04 debt; 05 (3) to make a written or oral inquiry or record of the medical debt of a 06 person seeking to rent or lease the real property; 07 (4) to represent to a person that the real property is not available for 08 inspection, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to refuse to allow a person 09 to inspect the real property because of the person's medical debt; 10 (5) to make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or 11 published, any notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the rental of the real 12 property that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on a 13 person's medical debt. 14 * Sec. 3. AS 18.80.300 is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 15 (19) "medical debt" has the meaning given in AS 45.85.800(c). 16 * Sec. 4. AS 45.48 is amended by adding a new section to read: 17 Article 6A. Miscellaneous Provisions. 18 Sec. 45.48.800. Medical debt. (a) A medical creditor or medical debt collector 19 may not communicate with or report information to a consumer credit reporting 20 agency regarding a medical debt. If a medical creditor or medical debt collector 21 communicates with or reports information to a consumer credit reporting agency 22 regarding the medical debt of a consumer in violation of this subsection, the 23 consumer's agreement to pay the debt is void and unenforceable. 24 (b) A consumer credit reporting agency may not include medical debt in a 25 consumer report or use medical debt to calculate a credit score. 26 (c) In this section, 27 (1) "medical creditor" means an entity that provides health care 28 services and to whom a consumer owes or, if purchased by a medical debt collector, 29 owed medical debt; 30 (2) "medical debt" means an obligation for the payment of money 31 arising out of an agreement or contract, express or implied, for the provision of health 01 care services, products, or devices; "medical debt" does not include debt charged to a 02 credit card or an extension of credit made by a financial institution to a borrower; 03 (3) "medical debt collector" means a person that 04 (A) regularly collects or attempts to collect, directly or 05 indirectly, medical debt originally owed or due, or asserted to be owed or due, 06 to another; 07 (B) purchases medical debt from an entity that provides health 08 care services. 09 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.